Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 7. Alaska Minerals Commission.

Sec. 44.33.431.
Alaska Minerals Commission established.

The Alaska Minerals Commission is established in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

The commission is composed of 11 members. The commission shall be composed of individuals who have at least five years’ experience in the various aspects of the minerals industries in the state. The governor shall appoint five members of the commission, one of whom must reside in a rural community. The president of the Senate shall appoint three members of the commission. The speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint three members of the commission. Each member serves at the pleasure of the appointing authority.

The commission shall make recommendations to the governor and to the legislature on ways to mitigate the constraints, including governmental constraints, on development of minerals, including coal, in the state.

The commission shall report its recommendations each year to the governor during the first 10 days of the regular session of the legislature. The commission shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

Members of the commission are appointed for staggered terms of three years. Except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), a member of the commission serves until a successor is appointed. Except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), an appointment to fill a vacancy on the commission is for the remainder of the unexpired term. A member who has served all or part of two successive terms on the commission may not be reappointed to the commission unless three years have elapsed since the person has last served on the commission.

The commission shall elect two of its members to serve as chair and vice-chair. When a vacancy occurs in the office of chair or vice-chair, the commission shall elect one of its members to serve the remaining term as chair or vice-chair. The term as chair or vice-chair is three years. The chair and vice-chair may be elected to not more than two successive terms as chair or vice-chair. After three years of not serving as chair or vice-chair, the member is eligible for election as chair or vice-chair again.

History.

(§ 2 ch 98 SLA 1986; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 71 SLA 1988; am § 92 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 2013)

Postponed repeal of section. —

Under sec. 1, ch. 12, SLA 1998, as amended by sec. 1, ch. 17, SLA 2003 and sec. 2, ch. 34, SLA 2013, this section is repealed effective February 1, 2024.

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted in 1986 as temporary law. Codified in 1988.

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (a) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, added (e) and (f).

Secs. 44.33.436 — 44.33.438.
Neighborhood revitalization and development fund; powers and duties; definitions. [Repealed, § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997.]

Secs. 44.33.450 — 44.33.500.
Alaska Agricultural Action Council. [Repealed, § 4 ch 75 SLA 1979.]